Illinois, session 104th, SB4023.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Professional Regulation Law 5of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by 6changing Section 2105-368 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2105/2105-368)8    Sec. 2105-368. Data on applications. 9    (a) In conjunction with applications for licensure and 10renewals, the Department shall request, and applicants may 11voluntarily provide, demographic information that includes 12sex, ethnicity, race, disability, primary language spoken, 13anticipated date of retirement, type of employment, and zip 14code. 15    (b) In conjunction with applications for health care 16professional licensure and renewals, the Department shall 17require applicants to provide practice information that 18include areas of practice specialty, addresses of all current 19practice locations, hours spent at each practice location on 20direct outpatient care, the applicant's National Provider 21Identifier (NPI) number if applicable, and anticipated date of 22retirement. The Department shall share this information with 23authorized personnel at the Department of Public Health. Data   SB4023- 2 -LRB104 20109 AAS 33560 b1specifically collected for this subsection shall be exempt 2from the Freedom of Information Act. 3    (c) On or before March 1 of each calendar year, the 4Department shall publish a report on the Department's website 5that contains aggregate data, including the demographic 6information it collected pursuant to subsection (a) in the 7preceding calendar year, the number of applications for 8licensure and renewal of licensure it received in the 9preceding calendar year, and the number of applicants who were 10denied licensure in the preceding calendar year regardless of 11whether application was made in that calendar year. None of 12the data published pursuant to this Section shall identify a 13health care professional's name or any other data that leads 14to identification. 15    (d) As used in this subsection, "health care professional" 16means a person licensed or registered by the Department under 17the following Acts: the Medical Practice Act of 1987, the 18Nurse Practice Act, the Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act, 19the Illinois Optometric Practice Act of 1987, the Illinois 20Physical Therapy Act, the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 211987, the Clinical Social Work and Social Work Practice Act, 22the Nursing Home Administrators Licensing and Disciplinary 23Act, the Illinois Occupational Therapy Practice Act, the 24Podiatric Medical Practice Act of 1987, the Respiratory Care 25Practice Act, the Professional Counselor and Clinical 26Professional Counselor Licensing and Practice Act, and the   SB4023- 3 -LRB104 20109 AAS 33560 b1Illinois Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology Practice Act.2(Source: P.A. 103-522, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 3104-311, eff. 1-1-26.)